Nevada, session 83, SB374.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 388.1333 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388.1333 1. To the extent that money is available, the
Department shall develop a statewide framework for restorative
justice. The statewide framework must, without limitation:
(a) In accordance with NRS 392.472, establish standards for a
plan of action based on restorative justice to enable a public school
to address the unique needs of pupils enrolled in the school;
(b) Provide for the identification of and address the needs of
homeless pupils, unaccompanied pupils or pupils in foster care;
(c) Address the occurrences of the suspension, expulsion or
removal of pupils from school that disproportionately affect pupils
who belong to a group of pupils listed in subsection 2 of
NRS 385A.250;
(d) Provide for the improvement of school climate, culture and
safety and pupil outcomes by providing information on, without
limitation:
(1) Multi-tiered systems of support;
(2) Early warning systems;
(3) Positive behavioral interventions and support;
(4) The provision of school social workers;
-
*SB374_R2*

– 3 –
(5) Curriculum on social and emotional learning; and
(6) Trauma-informed practices; and
(e) Provide for training for teachers, administrators and other
school staff in:
(1) Child and adolescent development;
(2) Restorative justice, including, without limitation, positive
behavioral interventions and support, conflict resolution and de-
escalation techniques; and
(3) Psychology, trauma and chronic stress, the effect of
trauma and chronic stress on pupils and learning and effective
responses to trauma and chronic stress.
2. If a teacher, administrator or other school staff member
completes training pursuant to this section, the board of trustees
of the school district which employs the teacher, administrator or
school staff member may consider such training to satisfy the
training required by section 1.5 of this act.
3. The Department may apply for grants, gifts and donations of
money to carry out the objectives of the statewide framework for
restorative justice.
[3.] 4. As used in this section:
(a) “Foster care” has the meaning ascribed to it in 45 C.F.R. §
1355.20.
(b) “Homeless pupil” has the meaning ascribed to the term
“homeless children and youths” in 42 U.S.C. § 11434a(2).
(c) “Restorative justice” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 392.472.
(d) “Unaccompanied pupil” has the meaning ascribed to the
term “unaccompanied youth” in 42 U.S.C. § 11434a(6).
Sec. 1.5. Chapter 391A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The board of trustees of each school district shall ensure
that not later than June 30, 2030, all staff members of the school
district, including, without limitation, teachers, administrators and
education support professionals, receive professional development
training in best practices for:
(a) Addressing the behavior of pupils;
(b) Fostering a positive school climate;
(c) Positive behavioral interventions and support;
(d) Conflict resolution;
(e) De-escalation techniques; and
(f) Classroom management.
2. The board of trustees of each school district shall ensure
that any staff member hired on or after July 1, 2030, must
complete the professional development training described in
-
*SB374_R2*

– 4 –
subsection 1 not later than 1 year after the date on which the staff
member commences employment with the school district.
3. The Department may coordinate with each regional
training program or engage with an appropriate vendor to develop
curricula for professional development training that the board of
trustees of a school district may use to provide the professional
development training required pursuant to subsection 1 or 2.
4. If a staff member completes training pursuant to NRS
388.1333, the board of trustees of a school district may consider
such training to satisfy the professional development training
required pursuant to subsection 1 or 2.
5. The board of trustees of each school district shall, on or
before August 1 of each year, prepare a report that describes any
professional development training provided pursuant to subsection
1 or 2 during the previous year, each date on which such
professional development training was provided and the total
percentage of staff members that attended such professional
development training during the immediately preceding school
year, and submit the report to the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmittal to:
(a) In even-numbered years, the next regular session of the
Legislature; and
(b) In odd-numbered years, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Education support professional” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 391.488.
(b) “Regional training program” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 391A.105.
(c) “School climate” means the basis of which to measure the
relationships between pupils and the parents or legal guardians of
pupils and educational personnel, the cultural and linguistic
competence of instructional materials and educational personnel,
the emotional and physical safety of pupils and educational
personnel and the social, emotional and academic development of
pupils and educational personnel.
Sec. 2. NRS 391A.345 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.345 As used in NRS 391A.345 to 391A.385, inclusive,
and section 1.5 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires,
“professional development training” has the meaning ascribed to
“professional development” in 20 U.S.C. § 7801(42).
Sec. 2.3. Chapter 392 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Department shall develop and maintain a system to
assist the board of trustees of a school district and the governing
-
*SB374_R2*

– 5 –
body of a charter school or university school for profoundly gifted
pupils in addressing disproportionate or high levels of pupil
discipline within the school district, charter school or university
school for profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable. The system
must:
(a) Focus on providing assistance to school districts and
governing bodies in need of support or corrective action as
determined by the Department based on data collected pursuant to
NRS 392.462; and
(b) Promote positive behavior by pupils, prevent disciplinary
practices that are exclusionary and support equitable outcomes for
all pupils by utilizing:
(1) A framework of social, emotional and positive
behavioral supports that progresses from universal screenings,
programs and activities for all pupils to targeted supports for
subgroups of pupils to individualized plans for specific pupils who
need the most social, emotional or positive behavioral supports;
and
(2) Evidence-based practices.
2. If the Department requires a board of trustees of a school
district or a governing body of a charter school or university
school for profoundly gifted pupils to participate in the system
developed and maintained pursuant to subsection 1, the board of
trustees or governing body shall:
(a) Appoint a person to be responsible for overseeing:
(1) The implementation of the system in the school district,
charter school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils;
(2) Any data collection required by the Department relating
to the system; and
(3) Coordination with the Department and other interested
parties concerning the system.
(b) Develop and carry out an action plan for the
implementation of the system with timelines, training, progress
monitoring and strategies for addressing discipline disparities.
(c) Submit data annually to the Department on trends in
discipline, intervention usage, metrics relating to the outcomes of
pupils and any other data the Department requests. Such data
must be submitted in any form requested by the Department,
including, without limitation, disaggregating the data into
subgroups of pupils.
(d) Engage families and community partners in the
implementation of the system and the review of the strategies and
effectiveness of the system.
3. The Department shall:
-
*SB374_R2*

– 6 –
(a) Compile a report concerning the data collected from the
boards of trustees of school districts and the governing bodies of
charter schools and university schools for profoundly gifted pupils
pursuant to subsection 2.
(b) On or before August 1 of each year, submit an annual
report on the implementation of the system in school districts,
charter schools and university schools for profoundly gifted pupils
and the outcomes from the implementation of the system at such
schools to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to:
(1) In odd-numbered years, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education; and
(2) In even-numbered years, the next regular session of the
Legislature.
Sec. 2.7. NRS 392.4601 is hereby amended to read as follows:
392.4601 As used in NRS 392.4601 to 392.472, inclusive, and
section 2.3 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 392.4603, 392.4605 and 392.4607
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. NRS 392.462 is hereby amended to read as follows:
392.462 Each public school shall quarterly collect data on the
discipline of pupils and the plans developed pursuant to NRS
392.4644. Such data must include, without limitation, the number of
expulsions and suspensions of pupils, the number of pupils
assigned to a temporary alternative placement pursuant to NRS
392.4645, the number of staff positions in the school that are vacant,
the average class size for each grade in the school, the
implementation of each plan, the training received by teachers and
administrators regarding each plan, the number of placements of
pupils in another school and the ratio of pupils to school counselors,
school psychologists and school social workers. Such data must be
disaggregated into the subgroups of pupils listed in subsection 2 of
NRS 385A.250 and the types of offense. The principal of each
public school shall:
1. Review the data and take appropriate action;
2. On or before August 1 of each year, report the data to:
(a) The board of trustees of the school district or the governing
body of the public school, as applicable;
(b) The superintendent of the school district or the
administrative head of the charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable;
(c) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education;
(d) The Superintendent of Public Instruction; and
(e) The Department; and
-
*SB374_R2*

– 7 –
3. To the extent allowed by the Family Educational Rights and
Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, post the data on the
Internet website maintained by the public school.
Sec. 4. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 5. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB374_R2*